Utah statutes.
32B-1-206.   Advertising prohibited -- Exceptions.

(1) (a)  The department may not advertise liquor, except:

(i)  the department may provide for an appropriate sign in the window or on the front of a state store or package agency denoting that it is a state authorized liquor retail facility;

(ii)  the department or a package agency may provide a printed price list to the public;

(iii)  the department may authorize the use of price posting and floor stacking of liquor within a state store;

(iv)  subject to Subsection (1)(b), the department may provide a listing of the address and telephone number of a state store in one or more printed or electronic directories available to the general public; and

(v)  subject to Subsection (1)(b), a package agency may provide a listing of its address and telephone number in one or more printed or electronic directories available to the general public.

(b)  A listing under Subsection (1)(a)(iv) or (v) in the business or yellow pages of a telephone directory may not be displayed in an advertisement or other promotional format.

(2) (a)  The department may not advertise an alcoholic product on a billboard.

(b)  A package agency may not advertise an alcoholic product on a billboard, except to the extent allowed by the commission by rule.

(3) (a)  The department may not display liquor or a price list in a window or showcase visible to passersby.

(b)  A package agency may not display liquor or a price list in a window or showcase visible to passersby, except to the extent allowed by the commission by rule.

(4)  Except to the extent prohibited by this title, the advertising of an alcoholic product is allowed under guidelines established by the commission by rule.

(5)  The advertising or use of any means or media to offer an alcoholic product to the general public without charge is prohibited.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 307, 2011 General Session

